Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 2 Administration and Management of the Assets of the Fund

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules of General Applicability, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, District Attorneys’ Retirement Fund of Georgia, Chapter 513-11-1.

Rules of General Applicability, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Sheriffs’ Retirement Fund of Georgia, Chapter 513-13-1.

Administrative Rules, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund of Georgia, Chapter 513-14-1.

47-17-20.
Membership of the board; manner of appointment; filling of vacancies; reimbursement of expenses; election of officers; quorum.

In order to carry out this chapter and to perform the duties fixed in it, there is created the Board of Commissioners of the Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund. The board shall be composed of six members, as follows:

The Governor or the Governor’s designee;

An appointee of the Governor who is not the Attorney General;

The Commissioner of Insurance or the Commissioner’s designee;

A peace officer actively employed by an agency of the state or a retired peace officer who was employed by an agency of the state upon retirement;

A peace officer actively employed by a county or a retired peace officer who was employed by a county upon retirement; and

A peace officer actively employed by a municipality or a retired peace officer who was employed by a municipality upon retirement.

Each of the members provided for under paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be an active member of the fund or a retired peace officer who is a beneficiary of the fund. Each such member shall be appointed by the Governor to take office on July 1, 1984. The initial member appointed pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be the successor to incumbent board member, Sergeant Robert Brown, whose regular term of office expires October 31, 1984, and the term of said incumbent member is shortened to expire on June 30, 1984; and the initial term of the successor appointed by the Governor shall be one year. The initial member appointed pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be the successor to incumbent board member, Captain Raymond Purvis, whose regular term of office expires on October 31, 1985, and the term of said incumbent member is shortened to expire on June 30, 1984; and the initial term of the successor appointed by the Governor shall be two years. The initial member appointed pursuant to paragraph (6) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be the successor to incumbent board member, Sergeant Terry McAfee, whose regular term of office expires October 31, 1984, and the term of said incumbent member is shortened to expire on June 30, 1984; and the initial term of the successor appointed by the Governor shall be three years. Thereafter, successors to such members shall be appointed by the Governor to take office upon the expiration of the respective terms of office for terms of three years. All such members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified.

If a vacancy occurs in a position on the board held by one of the members appointed pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, the Governor shall fill such vacancy for the unexpired term within 30 days after the date the vacancy occurred. The members of the board shall receive the same expense allowance as that received by members of the General Assembly and the same mileage allowance for the use of a personal automobile as that received by other state officials or employees or a travel allowance of actual transportation costs if traveling by public carrier within the state. Any board member shall also be reimbursed for any conference or meeting registration fee incurred in the performance of the member’s duties as a board member. For each day’s service outside of the state as a board member, such member shall receive actual expenses as an expense allowance as well as the same mileage allowance for the use of a personal automobile as that received by other state officials and employees or a travel allowance of actual transportation costs if traveling by public carrier or by rental motor vehicle. The board, by regulation, shall provide for the submission and approval of expense vouchers in conformity with the requirements of this subsection.

The board shall elect from its members a chairman and a vice-chairman.

A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of transacting all business that may come before the board.

The executive committee of the Peace Officers’ Association of Georgia shall submit to the Governor a list of three names for each person to be appointed by the Governor pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section as a member of the board. In making appointments pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, the Governor may consider the names submitted by the executive committee, but it is specifically provided that the appointments shall be at the sole discretion of the Governor, and the Governor shall not be required to choose any appointee from names submitted by the executive committee.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 50, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1956, p. 280, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 341, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 330, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 39, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 926, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 426, § 1.

Cross references.

Expense allowances for General Assembly members, §

28-1-8

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1984, p. 926, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor [March 28, 1984] or upon its otherwise becoming law for the purpose of allowing the Governor to consider appointments pursuant to said quoted Code Section 47-17-20 of Section 1 of this Act. This Act shall become effective for all purposes on July 1, 1984.”

47-17-21.
Creation of the office of secretary-treasurer; duties and compensation; quarterly report and accounting to the board; performance bond.

There is created the office of secretary-treasurer of the Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund. The secretary-treasurer shall be elected by the board and shall serve at its pleasure. His compensation shall be fixed by the board. He shall perform the duties provided for in this chapter and such other duties and services as the board may direct.

The secretary-treasurer shall give a good and sufficient surety bond in such an amount as may be determined by the board, and such surety bond shall be conditioned upon the proper and faithful performance of his duties as secretary-treasurer.

The secretary-treasurer shall make quarterly reports to the board showing the total amount of money in his hands at the time of making such report and also showing a full accounting of receipts and expenditures since his last quarterly report.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 50, § 3; Ga. L. 1956, p. 280, § 2.

47-17-22.
Powers and duties of the board generally.

The board is given the following powers and duties:

To provide for the collection of all moneys provided for in this chapter;

To provide for payment of all annuities and benefits under this chapter;

To provide for and maintain all necessary administrative facilities and personnel;

To provide for payment of all administrative salaries, fees, and expenses;

To hear and determine applications for membership in this fund according to the terms of this chapter;

To hear and determine applications for retirement, disability, and death benefits according to the terms of this chapter;

To make rules, regulations, and requirements consistent with this chapter for determining eligibility of members for disability, death, and retirement benefits;

To delegate its authority to invest funds to one or more members of the board;

To provide for the keeping of minutes and records of all meetings and proceedings of the board, including all rules, regulations, delegations, and requirements passed upon by the board;

To delegate any and all duties and authorities granted in this Code section to the secretary-treasurer under such conditions as may be deemed proper by the board, provided that the board shall at all times hear and determine any matter arising under this chapter if it so desires, if such matter is referred to it by the secretary-treasurer, or if such matter is appealed to the board by any person affected by a decision made by the secretary-treasurer;

To exercise such other powers, not inconsistent with this chapter, as are necessary for the proper administration of this chapter; and

To correct errors in the records of the fund in those instances in which an error results in a member or beneficiary receiving more or less than he or she would have been entitled to receive had the records been correct and to adjust the payments, as far as is practicable, in such a manner that the member or beneficiary is paid the actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which he or she is actually entitled.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 50, § 5; Ga. L. 1951, p. 472, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 280, § 5; Ga. L. 1958, p. 341, § 2; Ga. L. 1962, p. 39, § 2; Ga. L. 1965, p. 593, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 74, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 63, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 786, § 1.

47-17-23.
Special account for funds; investment powers of board; gifts, grants, and bequests.

The board shall have such control of the funds provided for in this chapter as is not inconsistent with this chapter and other general laws. All funds received by the board shall be deposited in a special account in the name of the Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund. The board shall have the authority to expend such funds in accordance with this chapter.

The board shall have full power to invest and reinvest such funds, subject to all the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by Article 7 of Chapter 20 of this title, the “Public Retirement Systems Investment Authority Law.” Subject to such terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions, the board shall have full power to hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, and dispose of any of the securities and investments in which any of the funds are invested, including the proceeds of any investments and any money belonging to the fund.

The board may take, by gift, grant, devise, or bequest, any money, real or personal property, or any other thing of value and hold or invest it for the uses and purposes of the fund in accordance with this chapter.

The board is authorized to employ agents, including, but not limited to, banks or trust departments thereof, and to enter into contracts with such agents for their services as investment advisers and counselors, in making recommendations for investments and in making investments if the board so authorizes.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 50, § 4; Ga. L. 1955, p. 387, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 280, § 4; Ga. L. 1963, p. 262, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 473, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 966, § 4; Ga. L. 2000, p. 2, § 12; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 65/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “advisers” for “advisors” in the middle of subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-17-24.
Duty of the board to keep permanent records of annuities and benefits granted; contents, preservation, and transfer of records, papers, and other data.

It shall be the duty of the board to keep permanent records of all its actions in granting annuities or benefits. Such records shall give the name of the recipient, the date of the beginning of the service of the involved peace officer, the date of such officer’s incapacity, retirement, or death, the reason therefor, and such other information as the board shall desire. All records, papers, and other data shall be carefully preserved and turned over to the succeeding members of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 50, § 6; Ga. L. 1956, p. 280, § 6.

47-17-25.
Duty of the state auditor to make an annual audit and report; audit upon request of the board; contents of annual report.

The state auditor is authorized and directed to make an annual audit of the acts and doings of the board and to make a complete report of the same to the General Assembly. The state auditor shall not be required to distribute copies of the report to the members of the General Assembly but shall notify the members of the availability of the report in the manner which he or she deems to be most effective and efficient. The report shall disclose all moneys received by the board and all its expenditures including administrative expenses and payments made as annuities and benefits. The state auditor shall also make an audit of affairs of the board at any time he or she is requested to do so by a majority of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 50, § 15; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036, § 36/SB 49.

47-17-26.
Methods of providing increases in maximum benefit payable under Article 6 of this chapter.

Subject to the terms and limitations of this Code section, the board of commissioners is authorized to adopt from time to time a method or methods of providing for increases in the maximum monthly retirement benefit payable under Article 6 of this chapter for persons theretofore or thereafter retiring under this chapter. Such method shall be based upon:

The recommendation of the actuary of the board of commissioners;

The maintenance of the actuarial soundness of the fund in accordance with the standards provided in Code Section 47-20-10 or such higher standards as may be adopted by the board; and

Such other factors as the board deems relevant.

Any such increase may be uniform or may vary in accordance with the time of retirement, length of service, age, nature of the retirement, or such other factors as the board of commissioners shall determine.

An initial increase may be granted pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section to become effective on July 1, 1993, not to exceed 3 percent of the maximum monthly retirement benefit then in effect. Thereafter, such increases may be authorized effective as of January 1 and July 1 of each year; provided, however, that no such increase shall exceed 1 1/2 percent of the maximum monthly retirement benefit then in effect.

No increase shall be made pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section to become effective within six months of the effective date of any increase in the maximum retirement benefit granted by the General Assembly through amendment of Code Section 47-17-80.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-17-26

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 607, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 66/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “board of commissioners” for “board of trustees” three times in subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-17-27.
Board authorized to employ hearing officer; powers and duties of hearing officer; appeal.

The board is authorized and empowered to appoint and compensate a hearing officer for the purpose of holding hearings, compiling evidence and information, and submitting evidence, information, and recommendations to the board in any contested case.

The hearing officer shall have the authority to do the following in connection with any hearing: administer oaths and affirmations; sign and issue subpoenas; rule upon offers of proof; regulate the course of the hearing, set the time and place for the hearing or any continued hearings, and fix the time for filing any briefs; provide for the taking of testimony by deposition or interrogatory; and reprimand or exclude from the hearing any person for any indecorous or improper conduct committed in the presence of the hearing officer. When a subpoena issued by the hearing officer is disobeyed, any interested party may apply to the superior court of the county where the hearing is being held for an order requiring obedience. Failure to comply with such order shall be cause for punishment as for contempt of court. Any applicant for disability benefits shall have the right to be represented by counsel before the hearing officer.

With respect to all hearings before the hearing officer:

Irrelevant, immaterial, or unduly repetitious evidence shall be excluded. The rules of evidence as applied in the trial of civil nonjury cases in the superior courts shall be followed. Evidence not admissible under such rules of evidence may be admitted if it is of a type commonly relied upon by reasonably prudent persons in the conduct of their affairs. The hearing officer shall give effect to the rules of privilege recognized by law; and

Documentary evidence may be received in the form of copies or excerpts if the original is not readily available. At the discretion of the hearing officer, the original shall be compared with the copy or excerpt.

The hearing officer, within 30 days from the close of the evidence or, if necessary, a longer period of time approved by the board, shall certify the entire record from the hearing to the board, together with his or her recommendation on the application. On review of the entire record from the hearing officer, the board shall have all the powers it would have in presiding at the reception of the evidence. In its discretion, the board may take additional testimony or remand the matter to the hearing officer for such purpose. The recommendation of the hearing officer to the board shall be made a part of the record before the board.

As a part of its decision subsequent to any hearing, the board shall include findings of fact and conclusions of law, separately stated, and the effective date of the decision. The decision of the board shall be mailed to the parties as soon after the rendition of the decision as is practicable.

Any party who is adversely affected by any final decision of the board may seek judicial review of the final decision of the board in the Superior Court of Spalding County. Proceedings for review shall be instituted by filing a petition with the court within 30 days after the decision is rendered. A copy of the petition shall be served upon the board. The petition shall state the nature of the petitioner’s interest, the facts showing that the petitioner is aggrieved by the decision of the hearing officer, and the grounds upon which the petitioner contends the decision should be reversed or remanded. The petition may be amended with leave of the court.

Within 30 days after the service of the petition or within further time allowed by the court, the hearing officer shall transmit to the reviewing court the original or a certified copy of the entire record of the proceeding under review. By agreement of the petitioner, the record may be shortened. The court may require or permit subsequent corrections or additions to the record.

The filing of the petition shall in no manner stay the enforcement of the decision of the hearing officer.

The review shall be conducted by the court without a jury and shall be confined to the record. The court shall not substitute its judgment for that of the hearing officer as to the weight of the evidence on questions of fact. The court may affirm the decision of the hearing officer or remand the case for further proceedings. The court may reverse the decision of the hearing officer if substantial rights of the petitioner have been prejudiced because the findings, inferences, conclusions, or decisions of the hearing officer are:

In violation of constitutional or statutory provisions;

In excess of the statutory authority of the hearing officer;

Made upon unlawful procedure;

Clearly erroneous in view of the reliable, probative, and substantial evidence on the whole record; or

Arbitrary or capricious.

A petitioner who is aggrieved by an order of the court in a proceeding authorized under this Code section may appeal to the Supreme Court of Georgia or the Court of Appeals of Georgia in accordance with Title 5.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-17-27

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 769, § 1/HB 928.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2012.